test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NID_C_nik_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfs
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:
     
  NID - C - nik :
     
  #Template Key
  #1	2	3	4	5	6	7
  #per	dim	the	pej	pos	mod	num
     
     #Isolation form
     nik: nik
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     1+nik: ninik
     2+nik: ginik
     3+nik: onik
     X+nik: inik
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     nik+NI+Con: nikenh
     nik+NI+Dim: nikens
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4
     nik+NI+Pej: nikish
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6
     nik+NI+Pret: nikiban
     nik+NI+VocPl: [nikidig, nikidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 7
     nik+NI+Loc: niking
     nik+NI+Obv: nikan
     nik+NI+Pl: nikan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     1+nik+NI+Con: ninikenh
     1+nik+NI+Dim: ninikens
     2+nik+NI+Con: ginikenh
     2+nik+NI+Dim: ginikens
     3+nik+NI+Con: onikenh
     3+nik+NI+Dim: onikens
     X+nik+NI+Con: inikenh
     X+nik+NI+Dim: inikens
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3
     1+nik+NI+Pos: ninikim
     2+nik+NI+Pos: ginikim
     3+nik+NI+Pos: onikim
     X+nik+NI+Pos: inikim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4
     1+nik+NI+Pej: ninikish
     2+nik+NI+Pej: ginikish
     3+nik+NI+Pej: onikish
     X+nik+NI+Pej: inikish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5
     1+nik+NI+1Pl: ninikinaan
     2+nik+NI+21: ginikinaan
     2+nik+NI+2Pl: ginikiwaa
     3+nik+NI+3Obv: onikini
     3+nik+NI+3Pl: onikiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6
     1+nik+NI+Pret: ninikiban
     1+nik+NI+VocPl: [ninikidig, ninikidog]
     2+nik+NI+Pret: ginikiban
     2+nik+NI+VocPl: [ginikidig, ginikidog]
     3+nik+NI+Pret: onikiban
     3+nik+NI+VocPl: [onikidig, onikidog]
     X+nik+NI+Pret: inikiban
     X+nik+NI+VocPl: [inikidig, inikidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 7
     1+nik+NI+Loc: niniking
     1+nik+NI+Obv: ninikan
     1+nik+NI+Pl: ninikan
     2+nik+NI+Loc: giniking
     2+nik+NI+Obv: ginikan
     2+nik+NI+Pl: ginikan
     3+nik+NI+Loc: oniking
     3+nik+NI+Obv: onikan
     3+nik+NI+Pl: onikan
     X+nik+NI+Loc: iniking
     X+nik+NI+Obv: inikan
     X+nik+NI+Pl: inikan
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4
     nik+NI+Con+Pej: nikenyish
     nik+NI+Dim+Pej: nikensish
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 6
     nik+NI+Con+Pret: nikenyiban
     nik+NI+Con+VocPl: [nikenyidig, nikenyidog]
     nik+NI+Dim+Pret: nikensiban
     nik+NI+Dim+VocPl: [nikensidig, nikensidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 7
     nik+NI+Con+Loc: nikenying
     nik+NI+Con+Obv: nikenyin
     nik+NI+Con+Pl: nikenyin
     nik+NI+Dim+Loc: nikensing
     nik+NI+Dim+Obv: nikensan
     nik+NI+Dim+Pl: nikensan
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 6
     nik+NI+Pej+Pret: nikishiban
     nik+NI+Pej+VocPl: [nikishidig, nikishidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 7
     nik+NI+Pej+Loc: nikishing
     nik+NI+Pej+Obv: nikishan
     nik+NI+Pej+Pl: nikishan
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6, 7
     nik+NI+Pret+Loc: nikibaniing
     nik+NI+Pret+Obv: nikibaniin
     nik+NI+Pret+Pl: nikibaniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     1+nik+NI+Con+Pos: ninikenyim
     1+nik+NI+Dim+Pos: ninikensim
     2+nik+NI+Con+Pos: ginikenyim
     2+nik+NI+Dim+Pos: ginikensim
     3+nik+NI+Con+Pos: onikenyim
     3+nik+NI+Dim+Pos: onikensim
     X+nik+NI+Con+Pos: inikenyim
     X+nik+NI+Dim+Pos: inikensim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     1+nik+NI+Con+Pej: ninikenyish
     1+nik+NI+Dim+Pej: ninikensish
     2+nik+NI+Con+Pej: ginikenyish
     2+nik+NI+Dim+Pej: ginikensish
     3+nik+NI+Con+Pej: onikenyish
     3+nik+NI+Dim+Pej: onikensish
     X+nik+NI+Con+Pej: inikenyish
     X+nik+NI+Dim+Pej: inikensish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5
     1+nik+NI+Con+1Pl: ninikenyinaan
     1+nik+NI+Dim+1Pl: ninikensinaan
     2+nik+NI+Con+21: ginikenyinaan
     2+nik+NI+Con+2Pl: ginikenyiwaa
     2+nik+NI+Dim+21: ginikensinaan
     2+nik+NI+Dim+2Pl: ginikensiwaa
     3+nik+NI+Con+3Obv: onikenyini
     3+nik+NI+Con+3Pl: onikenyiwaa
     3+nik+NI+Dim+3Obv: onikensini
     3+nik+NI+Dim+3Pl: onikensiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6
     1+nik+NI+Con+Pret: ninikenyiban
     1+nik+NI+Con+VocPl: [ninikenyidig, ninikenyidog]
     1+nik+NI+Dim+Pret: ninikensiban
     1+nik+NI+Dim+VocPl: [ninikensidig, ninikensidog]
     2+nik+NI+Con+Pret: ginikenyiban
     2+nik+NI+Con+VocPl: [ginikenyidig, ginikenyidog]
     2+nik+NI+Dim+Pret: ginikensiban
     2+nik+NI+Dim+VocPl: [ginikensidig, ginikensidog]
     3+nik+NI+Con+Pret: onikenyiban
     3+nik+NI+Con+VocPl: [onikenyidig, onikenyidog]
     3+nik+NI+Dim+Pret: onikensiban
     3+nik+NI+Dim+VocPl: [onikensidig, onikensidog]
     X+nik+NI+Con+Pret: inikenyiban
     X+nik+NI+Con+VocPl: [inikenyidig, inikenyidog]
     X+nik+NI+Dim+Pret: inikensiban
     X+nik+NI+Dim+VocPl: [inikensidig, inikensidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 7
     1+nik+NI+Con+Loc: ninikenying
     1+nik+NI+Con+Obv: ninikenyin
     1+nik+NI+Con+Pl: ninikenyin
     1+nik+NI+Dim+Loc: ninikensing
     1+nik+NI+Dim+Obv: ninikensan
     1+nik+NI+Dim+Pl: ninikensan
     2+nik+NI+Con+Loc: ginikenying
     2+nik+NI+Con+Obv: ginikenyin
     2+nik+NI+Con+Pl: ginikenyin
     2+nik+NI+Dim+Loc: ginikensing
     2+nik+NI+Dim+Obv: ginikensan
     2+nik+NI+Dim+Pl: ginikensan
     3+nik+NI+Con+Loc: onikenying
     3+nik+NI+Con+Obv: onikenyin
     3+nik+NI+Con+Pl: onikenyin
     3+nik+NI+Dim+Loc: onikensing
     3+nik+NI+Dim+Obv: onikensan
     3+nik+NI+Dim+Pl: onikensan
     X+nik+NI+Con+Loc: inikenying
     X+nik+NI+Con+Obv: inikenyin
     X+nik+NI+Con+Pl: inikenyin
     X+nik+NI+Dim+Loc: inikensing
     X+nik+NI+Dim+Obv: inikensan
     X+nik+NI+Dim+Pl: inikensan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4
     1+nik+NI+Pos+Pej: ninikimish
     2+nik+NI+Pos+Pej: ginikimish
     3+nik+NI+Pos+Pej: onikimish
     X+nik+NI+Pos+Pej: inikimish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5
     1+nik+NI+Pos+1Pl: ninikiminaan
     2+nik+NI+Pos+21: ginikiminaan
     2+nik+NI+Pos+2Pl: ginikimiwaa
     3+nik+NI+Pos+3Obv: onikimini
     3+nik+NI+Pos+3Pl: onikimiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6
     1+nik+NI+Pos+Pret: ninikimiban
     1+nik+NI+Pos+VocPl: [ninikimidig, ninikimidog]
     2+nik+NI+Pos+Pret: ginikimiban
     2+nik+NI+Pos+VocPl: [ginikimidig, ginikimidog]
     3+nik+NI+Pos+Pret: onikimiban
     3+nik+NI+Pos+VocPl: [onikimidig, onikimidog]
     X+nik+NI+Pos+Pret: inikimiban
     X+nik+NI+Pos+VocPl: [inikimidig, inikimidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 7
     1+nik+NI+Pos+Loc: ninikiming
     1+nik+NI+Pos+Obv: ninikiman
     1+nik+NI+Pos+Pl: ninikiman
     2+nik+NI+Pos+Loc: ginikiming
     2+nik+NI+Pos+Obv: ginikiman
     2+nik+NI+Pos+Pl: ginikiman
     3+nik+NI+Pos+Loc: onikiming
     3+nik+NI+Pos+Obv: onikiman
     3+nik+NI+Pos+Pl: onikiman
     X+nik+NI+Pos+Loc: inikiming
     X+nik+NI+Pos+Obv: inikiman
     X+nik+NI+Pos+Pl: inikiman
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5
     1+nik+NI+Pej+1Pl: ninikishinaan
     2+nik+NI+Pej+21: ginikishinaan
     2+nik+NI+Pej+2Pl: ginikishiwaa
     3+nik+NI+Pej+3Obv: onikishini
     3+nik+NI+Pej+3Pl: onikishiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 6
     1+nik+NI+Pej+Pret: ninikishiban
     1+nik+NI+Pej+VocPl: [ninikishidig, ninikishidog]
     2+nik+NI+Pej+Pret: ginikishiban
     2+nik+NI+Pej+VocPl: [ginikishidig, ginikishidog]
     3+nik+NI+Pej+Pret: onikishiban
     3+nik+NI+Pej+VocPl: [onikishidig, onikishidog]
     X+nik+NI+Pej+Pret: inikishiban
     X+nik+NI+Pej+VocPl: [inikishidig, inikishidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 7
     1+nik+NI+Pej+Loc: ninikishing
     1+nik+NI+Pej+Obv: ninikishan
     1+nik+NI+Pej+Pl: ninikishan
     2+nik+NI+Pej+Loc: ginikishing
     2+nik+NI+Pej+Obv: ginikishan
     2+nik+NI+Pej+Pl: ginikishan
     3+nik+NI+Pej+Loc: onikishing
     3+nik+NI+Pej+Obv: onikishan
     3+nik+NI+Pej+Pl: onikishan
     X+nik+NI+Pej+Loc: inikishing
     X+nik+NI+Pej+Obv: inikishan
     X+nik+NI+Pej+Pl: inikishan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 6
     1+nik+NI+1Pl+Pret: ninikinaaniban
     1+nik+NI+1Pl+VocPl: [ninikinaanidig, ninikinaanidog]
     2+nik+NI+21+Pret: ginikinaaniban
     2+nik+NI+21+VocPl: [ginikinaanidig, ginikinaanidog]
     2+nik+NI+2Pl+Pret: ginikiwaaban
     2+nik+NI+2Pl+VocPl: [ginikiwaadig, ginikiwaadog]
     3+nik+NI+3Obv+Pret: onikiniiban
     3+nik+NI+3Obv+VocPl: [onikiniidig, onikiniidog]
     3+nik+NI+3Pl+Pret: onikiwaaban
     3+nik+NI+3Pl+VocPl: [onikiwaadig, onikiwaadog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 7
     1+nik+NI+1Pl+Loc: ninikinaaning
     1+nik+NI+1Pl+Obv: ninikinaanin
     1+nik+NI+1Pl+Pl: ninikinaanin
     2+nik+NI+21+Loc: ginikinaaning
     2+nik+NI+21+Obv: ginikinaanin
     2+nik+NI+21+Pl: ginikinaanin
     2+nik+NI+2Pl+Loc: ginikiwaang
     2+nik+NI+2Pl+Obv: ginikiwaan
     2+nik+NI+2Pl+Pl: ginikiwaan
     3+nik+NI+3Obv+Loc: onikiniing
     3+nik+NI+3Obv+Obv: onikiniin
     3+nik+NI+3Obv+Pl: onikiniin
     3+nik+NI+3Pl+Loc: onikiwaang
     3+nik+NI+3Pl+Obv: onikiwaan
     3+nik+NI+3Pl+Pl: onikiwaan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6, 7
     1+nik+NI+Pret+Loc: ninikibaniing
     1+nik+NI+Pret+Obv: ninikibaniin
     1+nik+NI+Pret+Pl: ninikibaniin
     2+nik+NI+Pret+Loc: ginikibaniing
     2+nik+NI+Pret+Obv: ginikibaniin
     2+nik+NI+Pret+Pl: ginikibaniin
     3+nik+NI+Pret+Loc: onikibaniing
     3+nik+NI+Pret+Obv: onikibaniin
     3+nik+NI+Pret+Pl: onikibaniin
     X+nik+NI+Pret+Loc: inikibaniing
     X+nik+NI+Pret+Obv: inikibaniin
     X+nik+NI+Pret+Pl: inikibaniin
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 6
     nik+NI+Con+Pej+Pret: nikenyishiban
     nik+NI+Con+Pej+VocPl: [nikenyishidig, nikenyishidog]
     nik+NI+Dim+Pej+Pret: nikensishiban
     nik+NI+Dim+Pej+VocPl: [nikensishidig, nikensishidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 7
     nik+NI+Con+Pej+Loc: nikenyishing
     nik+NI+Con+Pej+Obv: nikenyishan
     nik+NI+Con+Pej+Pl: nikenyishan
     nik+NI+Dim+Pej+Loc: nikensishing
     nik+NI+Dim+Pej+Obv: nikensishan
     nik+NI+Dim+Pej+Pl: nikensishan
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 6, 7
     nik+NI+Con+Pret+Loc: nikenyibaniing
     nik+NI+Con+Pret+Obv: nikenyibaniin
     nik+NI+Con+Pret+Pl: nikenyibaniin
     nik+NI+Dim+Pret+Loc: nikensibaniing
     nik+NI+Dim+Pret+Obv: nikensibaniin
     nik+NI+Dim+Pret+Pl: nikensibaniin
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 6, 7
     nik+NI+Pej+Pret+Loc: nikishibaniing
     nik+NI+Pej+Pret+Obv: nikishibaniin
     nik+NI+Pej+Pret+Pl: nikishibaniin
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4
     1+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pej: ninikenyimish
     1+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej: ninikensimish
     2+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pej: ginikenyimish
     2+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej: ginikensimish
     3+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pej: onikenyimish
     3+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej: onikensimish
     X+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pej: inikenyimish
     X+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej: inikensimish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5
     1+nik+NI+Con+Pos+1Pl: ninikenyiminaan
     1+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+1Pl: ninikensiminaan
     2+nik+NI+Con+Pos+21: ginikenyiminaan
     2+nik+NI+Con+Pos+2Pl: ginikenyimiwaa
     2+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+21: ginikensiminaan
     2+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+2Pl: ginikensimiwaa
     3+nik+NI+Con+Pos+3Obv: onikenyimini
     3+nik+NI+Con+Pos+3Pl: onikenyimiwaa
     3+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+3Obv: onikensimini
     3+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+3Pl: onikensimiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 6
     1+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pret: ninikenyimiban
     1+nik+NI+Con+Pos+VocPl: [ninikenyimidig, ninikenyimidog]
     1+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pret: ninikensimiban
